test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s66_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - biðja: # 
    biðja+V+Inf: biðja
    biðja+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: biður
    biðja+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: bað
    biðja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bóðu
    biðja+V+Sup: biðið
    biðja+V+Inf: biðja
